Hawaii, session 2025, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii is currently experiencing a shortage of nearly eight hundred physicians. The legislature further finds that in recent years, the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine has admitted seventy-seven new entrants per year, consisting of sixty-seven Hawaii residents and ten out-of-state residents. For the 2025-2026 academic year, expected Hawaii resident tuition will be $36,372 and out-of-state tuition will be $71,328. The legislature also finds that only about half of the individuals in each year's graduating class of the John A. Burns school of medicine serve as a physician in Hawaii, whereas approximately eighty per cent of the graduates who complete a residency in Hawaii remain in Hawaii to serve as a physician. The legislature believes that each graduate who benefits from less expensive Hawaii resident tuition, which is subsidized by the tens of millions of dollars in general funds appropriated to the John A. Burns school of medicine by the legislature each year, should be committed to using their medical knowledge for the benefit of Hawaii. The legislature additionally finds that requiring graduates of the John A. Burns school of medicine who benefitted from in‑state tuition to serve as a physician in the State following their medical residency or fellowship is a matter of statewide concern pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution. The purpose of this Act is to require each graduate of the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine who benefitted from Hawaii resident tuition to commit to serving as a physician in Hawaii for two years following a residency or fellowship. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "SUBPART     .  JOhn A. Burns school of medicine resident tuition Fee §304A-A  John A. Burns school of medicine; resident tuition fee.  (a)  This section shall apply to each individual who: (1)  Qualified for and paid resident tuition fee under section 304A-402 while enrolled in a program that culminated in the award of a doctor of medicine degree; and (2)  After January 1, 2029, is awarded a doctor of medicine degree by the university of Hawaii. (b) Each individual under subsection (a) shall commence serving as a physician in the State within five years after completion of medical residency or fellowship, whichever is later.  The individual shall continue serving as a physician in the State for not less than two consecutive years. (c) Any individual under subsection (a) who does not commence serving as a physician or continue serving as a physician as required under subsection (b) shall reimburse the State for the difference between the resident tuition fee and the non-resident tuition fee for each year the individual paid for resident tuition fee. §304A-B  Extenuating circumstances.  The dean of the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine, by rule, may exempt any individual from the requirements of section 304A‑A if the dean determines that there are extenuating circumstances.  The dean may extend the five-year period to commence serving as a physician under section 304A-A(b) due to extenuating circumstances. §304A-C  Program administration.  (a) The university of Hawaii shall monitor and verify each applicable individual's fulfillment of the requirements under section 304A-A. (b) The university of Hawaii may enter into a contract with a private or public entity to enforce the requirements under section 304A-A. (c) The university of Hawaii shall enforce payment of amounts owed under section 304A-A(c).  Enforcement shall include the use of all lawful collection procedures, including private collection agencies. §304A-D Annual report.  The university of Hawaii shall submit a report on section 304A-A to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2036 and every year thereafter.  The report shall include information on the number of individuals under section 304A‑A(a), separated by year of graduation, who: (1)  Have satisfied the requirements of section 304A-A(b); (2)  Are making reasonable progress toward satisfying the requirements of section 304A-A(b); (3)  Have been subject to reimbursement under section 304A‑A(c) and the status of those reimbursements; and (4)  Have been subject to extenuating circumstances under section 304A‑B." SECTION 3. In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2050.